Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4411
Member or owner; prohibitions.

A risk retention group shall not do business in this state if an insurance company is directly or indirectly a member or owner of such group, other than in the case of a risk retention group all of whose members are insurance companies.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 11.